Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.230

Unprofessional conduct or inability to practice—Penalties.

Upon a finding that a license holder or applicant has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the director may issue an order providing for one or any combination of the following:

(1) Revocation of the license;

(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;

(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;

(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of remedial education or treatment;

(5) Monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the director;

(6) Censure or reprimand;

(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(8) Withholding a license request;

(9) Other corrective action;

(10) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer; or

(11) The assessment of administrative penalties.

Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the director. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued under this section are the obligation of the license holder or applicant.

[ 1995 c 277 s 15; 1991 c 334 s 23.]